Illinois, session 104th, HB4476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation 5Act of 2013 is amended by changing Section 3-104 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 49/3-104)7    Sec. 3-104. Care, treatment, and records. Facilities shall 8provide, at a minimum, the following services: physician, 9nursing, pharmaceutical, rehabilitative, and dietary services. 10To provide these services, the facility shall adhere to the 11following: 12        (1) Each consumer shall be encouraged and assisted to 13    achieve and maintain the highest level of self-care and 14    independence. Every effort shall be made to keep consumers 15    active and out of bed for reasonable periods of time, 16    except when contraindicated by physician orders.17        (2) Every consumer shall be engaged in a 18    person-centered planning process regarding his or her 19    total care and treatment.20        (3) All medical treatment and procedures shall be 21    administered as ordered by a physician. All new physician 22    orders shall be reviewed by the facility's director of 23    nursing or charge nurse designee within 24 hours after   HB4476- 2 -LRB104 17630 BAB 31061 b1    such orders have been issued to ensure facility compliance 2    with such orders. According to rules adopted by the 3    Department, every woman consumer of child bearing age 4    shall receive routine obstetrical and gynecological 5    evaluations as well as necessary prenatal care.6        (4) Each consumer shall be provided with good 7    nutrition and with necessary fluids for hydration.8        (5) Each consumer shall be provided visual privacy 9    during treatment and personal care.10        (6) Every consumer or consumer's guardian shall be 11    permitted to inspect and copy all his or her clinical and 12    other records concerning his or her care kept by the 13    facility or by his or her physician. The facility may 14    charge a reasonable fee for duplication of a record.15        (7) Each consumer shall be offered at least 15 hours 16    of treatment programming per week and encouraged to attend 17    the treatment domains that meet the consumer's needs, as 18    reflected in the consumer's treatment plans. Each 19    consumer's program engagement and attendance shall be 20    documented in the consumer's clinical record, and each 21    consumer shall be prompted to attend programming regularly 22    as documented in the consumer's clinical record at least 23    quarterly. 24(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 262026.